Missouri, session 2026, HB3086.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the state of Missouri, as follows:
Section A. Section 478.705, RSMo, is repealed and one new section enacted in lieu
thereof, to be known as section 478.705, to read as follows:
478.705. 1. There shall be three circuit judges in the twenty-sixth judicial circuit
consisting of the counties of Camden, Laclede, Miller, Moniteau and Morgan. These judges
shall sit in divisions numbered one, two, and three.
2. The circuit judge in division two shall be elected in 1980. The circuit judge in
division one shall be elected in 1982. The governor shall appoint a judge for division three
and notwithstanding the provisions of section 105.030, that judge shall serve until January 1,
2021. A judge for division three shall be elected in 2020.
3. There shall be one additional associate circuit judge in Miller County. This
associate circuit judge shall not be included in the statutory formula for authorizing
additional associate circuit judges per county as provided under section 478.320. The
governor shall appoint such judge, and that judge shall serve until January 1, 2029. An
associate circuit judge shall be elected in 2028.
✔
EXPLANATION — Matter enclosed in bold-faced brackets [thus] in the above bill is not enacted and is
intended to be omitted from the law. Matter in bold-face type in the above bill is proposed language.